Maine, session 132, LD247.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §1101, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1977, c. 259, §1, is amended to
read:
2. Place. "Place" means any natural geographic feature or of the State; any square,
bridge, tunnel or street, alley or other road within the jurisdiction of the State, or; any
political subdivision of the State; or a building, facility, park or cultural feature owned,
leased or operated by the State or any political subdivision of the State.
Sec. 2. 1 MRSA §1104, as amended by PL 1999, c. 613, §2 and PL 2011, c. 657,
Pt. W, §6, is further amended to read:
§1104. Responsibility of municipal officers and county commissioners
The municipal officers of the municipality or the county commissioners responsible
for the unorganized territory, in which a place is found by the Maine Human Rights
Commission pursuant to Title 5, section 4632, to have an offensive name, shall have the
following responsibilities:
1. Reasonable actions. They shall take Take whatever reasonable actions are required
to complete a change in the offensive name. They including, but not limited to, petitioning
and engaging the Maine Board on Place Names under Title 5, section 1997, and may hold
public hearings on selecting a new name; and
1-A. Consult with Maine Board on Place Names. Notify the Maine Board on Place
Names under Title 5, section 1997 within 5 days of the Maine Human Rights Commission
finding that the place has an offensive name and shall follow the process established by the
Maine Board on Place Names pursuant to Title 5, section 1997; and
2. Notification. Unless a court order is issued under Title 5, section 4632 specifying
a different deadline, within 6 months of the determination finding by the Maine Human
Rights Commission that the place has an offensive name, they shall provide notice of the
new name to the Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, the Secretary
of the United States Department Secretary of the Interior and other public agencies, boards,
committees or other groups responsible for changing names of places and for ensuring that
such the name changes appear on maps and other public documents.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §1997 is enacted to read:
§1997. Maine Board on Place Names
1. Established. The Maine Board on Place Names, established by section 12004-I,
subsection 75-D and referred to in this section as "the board," shall establish policies and
procedures for naming and renaming places in the State and shall serve as an advisor to
local units of government seeking to name or rename a place and to the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services' unofficial liaison to the United States Department
of the Interior, United States Geological Survey, United States Board on Geographic
Names, referred to in this section as "the Board on Geographic Names," who communicates
recommendations for naming or renaming places. For purposes of this section, "place" has
the same meaning as in Title 1, section 1101, subsection 2.
2. Members. The board consists of 11 members as follows:
Page 1 - 132LR0204(01)

A. One member who is a faculty member of a college or university in the State
specializing in genealogical or anthropological research, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
B. One member recommended by the chief of a federally recognized Indian tribe,
nation or band located in the State, appointed by the President of the Senate;
C. One member who is a faculty member of a college or university in the State
specializing in the history, culture or civil and human rights of historically
disadvantaged racial, indigenous and tribal populations, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
D. One member who is a scholar of linguistics or a person familiar with language
preservation, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
E. One member recommended by the coordinator of special collections at the
University of Southern Maine, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
F. One member of a statewide organization based in the State promoting civil rights
that has racial justice or racial equity as its primary mission, appointed by the Speaker
of the House;
G. One member recommended by the chief of a federally recognized Indian tribe,
nation or band located in the State who is not from the same tribal community as the
member appointed pursuant to paragraph B, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
H. One member who is an employee of the Office of Geographic Information Systems
within the Office of Information Technology and who serves as the unofficial liaison
to the Board on Geographic Names and who is a mapping professional, recommended
by the Chief Information Officer;
I. The State Archivist or the State Archivist's designee;
J. The State Geologist or the State Geologist's designee; and
K. The State Historian or the State Historian's designee.
In appointing members of the board, the appointing authorities shall give consideration to
racial, ethnic, gender, socioeconomic and geographic diversity.
3. Chair. The chair of the board must be selected from among its members at the first
meeting of the board each year. The chair shall call and preside at meetings of the board
and shall perform such other duties as the board may assign. If a chair is no longer willing
or able to serve, the board shall select a chair from among its members at the next meeting
of the board.
4. Terms; vacancy; quorum. Members of the board serve 2-year terms and continue
serving until either reappointed or replaced. In case of the termination of a member's
service during that member's term, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor for
the unexpired term. A majority of members constitutes a quorum for the purpose of
conducting the business of the board.
5. Duties. The board shall:
A. Meet on a regular basis at least 6 times per year;
Page 2 - 132LR0204(01)

B. Advise the member of the board serving as the State’s unofficial liaison to the Board
on Geographic Names pursuant to subsection 2, paragraph H;
C. Develop, oversee and make public policies and procedures for petitioning the board
to name or rename a place and for filing a petition with the Board on Geographic
Names, Domestic Names Committee;
D. Develop and implement a public engagement campaign to raise awareness about
place names, their history and the public process by which place names are chosen;
E. Give notice to the Board of Geographic Names, Domestic Names Committee of
scheduled board meetings; and
F. Recommend policies and procedures for a petitioner to use to solicit input on
petitions to name or rename a place, which may include:
(1) Public engagement through advertised public presentations;
(2) Outreach to solicit public input through local populations;
(3) Public outreach to nonlocal populations;
(4) Educational materials that are made readily available to the public;
(5) Appropriate time and options for a dedicated public comment period; and
(6) Recorded public voting administered by the election official in the affected
local unit of government where there is a request for the naming or renaming of a
place.
6. Additional responsibilities. The board may take on the following additional
responsibilities as resources allow:
A. Acting as a liaison with state and federal agencies and the governments of Indian
tribes, nations and bands in the State to ensure consistency in data and mapping
products;
B. Developing recommendations on best practices in naming or renaming places;
C. Sustaining active membership in a national nonprofit association of state and federal
government agencies representing the official and recognized geographic names
authorities in the United States that work to promote national standardization of the
names of geographic features for official use throughout the country; and
D. Issuing recommendations on petitions to name or rename a place.
7. Compensation. Board members not otherwise compensated for serving on the board
by their employers or other entities that they represent are eligible to receive a legislative
per diem, as defined in section 12002, subsection 3, in accordance with section 12002-B.
Board members may be compensated only for up to 4 meetings per month.
Nothing in this subsection is intended to exempt members of the board from the provisions
of section 18-A.
8. Funding. The board may receive and accept, from any source, allocations,
appropriations, loans, grants and contributions of money or other things of value to be held,
used or applied to carry out this section, subject to the conditions upon which the loans,
grants and contributions may be made, including, but not limited to, appropriations,
Page 3 - 132LR0204(01)

411 allocations, loans, grants or gifts from a private source, federal agency or governmental
422 subdivision of the State or its agencies to name or rename a place.
The board may receive and disburse funds made available to it for education programs,
assisting the public in understanding the history of place names and providing local
assistance on initiating a petition to the board to name or rename a place.
9. Staffing. The board may employ personnel as it considers necessary and desirable
in order to effectively discharge its duties and responsibilities.
10. Reporting. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the board shall submit
a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over state and
local government matters, the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over agriculture, conservation and forestry matters and the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over inland fisheries and wildlife matters.
The report must include a list of local units of government that have petitioned to name or
rename a place, the status and outcome of each petition, recommendations for changes to
existing place names and recommendations for suggested legislation to improve the process
of naming or renaming a place. Each committee may report out legislation in the regular
or special session of the biennium in which the committee receives the report.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§75-D is enacted to read:
75-D.
State Maine Board on Place Names Legislative Per 5 MRSA
Government Diem for Certain §1997
Members
2230 Sec. 5. Staggered terms. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5,
2241 section 1997, subsection 4, initial appointments to the Maine Board on Place Names must
2252 be staggered as follows:
1. Of the members appointed by the President of the Senate, one member must be
appointed for a one-year term and 2 members must be appointed for 2-year terms; and
2. Of the members appointed by the Speaker of the House, 2 members must be
appointed for one-year terms and 2 members must be appointed for 2-year terms.
Sec. 6. Moratorium on requests to Board on Geographic Names for naming
or renaming of nonadministrative places. For a period of 180 days after the effective
date of this legislation, the Department of Administrative and Financial Services may not
process or act upon any petitions to the United States Department of the Interior, United
States Geological Survey, United States Board on Geographic Names for the naming or
renaming of a natural geographic feature of the State or any square, bridge, tunnel or street,
alley or other road within the jurisdiction of the State.